Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2202
Service when sheriff is a party or is interested.

An order for a provisional remedy or any other process, in an action wherein the sheriff is a party, or is interested, shall be directed to the coroner. If both these officers are interested, the process shall be directed to and executed by a person appointed by the court or judge.

R.S.1867, Code § 881, p. 547;

R.S.1913, § 8550;

C.S.1922, § 9501;

C.S.1929, § 20-2202;

R.S.1943, § 25-2202.

Where sheriff is party, private person may be deputized to serve process. Mysenburg v. Leisure, 63 Neb. 239, 88 N.W. 478 (1901).